Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1455
Public housing; not subject to act.

The Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall not apply to an occupancy in or operation of public housing as authorized, provided, or conducted pursuant to any federal law or regulation with which the act might conflict.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 6.